Missouri, session 2026, HB1828.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 42.300, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 42.300, to read as follows:
42.300. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Veterans Commission
Capital Improvement Trust Fund" which shall consist of money collected under section
313.835. The state treasurer shall administer the veterans commission capital improvement
trust fund, and the moneys in such fund shall be used solely, upon appropriation, by the
Missouri veterans commission for:
(1) The construction, maintenance or renovation or equipment needs of veterans'
homes in this state;
(2) The construction, maintenance, renovation, equipment needs and operation of
veterans' cemeteries in this state;
(3) Fund transfers to Missouri veterans' homes fund established under the provisions
of section 42.121, as necessary to maintain solvency of the fund;
(4) Fund transfers to any municipality with a population greater than four hundred
thousand and located in part of a county with a population greater than six hundred thousand
in this state which has established a fund for the sole purpose of the restoration, renovation,
and maintenance of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to World War I. Appropriations
from the veterans commission capital improvement trust fund to such memorial fund shall be
provided only as a one-time match for other funds devoted to the project and shall not exceed
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1828 2
five million dollars. Additional appropriations not to exceed ten million dollars total may be
made from the veterans commission capital improvement trust fund as a match to other funds
for the new construction or renovation of other facilities dedicated as veterans' memorials in
the state. All appropriations for renovation, new construction, reconstruction, and
maintenance of veterans' memorials shall be made only for applications received by the
Missouri veterans commission prior to July 1, 2004;
(5) The issuance of matching fund grants for veterans' service officer programs to any
federally chartered veterans' organization or municipal government agency that is certified by
the Veterans Administration to process veteran claims within the Veterans Administration
System; provided that such veterans' organization has maintained a veterans' service officer
presence within the state of Missouri for the three-year period immediately preceding the
issuance of any such grant. A total of one million five hundred thousand dollars in grants
shall be made available annually for service officers and joint training and outreach between
veterans' service organizations and the Missouri veterans commission with grants being
issued in July of each year. Application for the matching grants shall be made through and
approved by the Missouri veterans commission based on the requirements established by the
commission;
(6) For payment of Missouri National Guard and Missouri veterans commission
expenses associated with providing medals, medallions and certificates in recognition of
service in the Armed Forces of the United States during World War II, the Korean Conflict,
and the Vietnam War under sections 42.170 to 42.226. Any funds remaining from the medals,
medallions and certificates shall not be transferred to any other fund and shall only be utilized
for the awarding of future medals, medallions, and certificates in recognition of service in the
Armed Forces;
(7) Fund transfers totaling ten million dollars to any municipality with a population
greater than three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants and located in part in a county with a
population greater than six hundred thousand inhabitants and with a charter form of
government, for the sole purpose of the construction, restoration, renovation, and
maintenance of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to World War I; [and]
(8) Fund transfers totaling no more than five hundred thousand dollars to any
county with more than seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than nineteen
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
than ten thousand inhabitants, for the sole purpose of the restoration, renovation, and
maintenance of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to Missouri and United States
veterans and their service; and
(9) The administration of the Missouri veterans commission.

HB 1828 3
2. Any interest which accrues to the fund shall remain in the fund and shall be used in
the same manner as moneys which are transferred to the fund under this section.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the veterans
commission capital improvement trust fund at the end of any biennium shall not be
transferred to the credit of the general revenue fund.
3. Upon request by the veterans commission, the general assembly may appropriate
moneys from the veterans commission capital improvement trust fund to the Missouri
National Guard trust fund to support the activities described in section 41.958.
✔